District of Columbia statutes.
47-3154

Penalties.

(a)

Any person aggrieved by a violation of § 47-3152 or § 47-3153 shall be entitled to institute an action to recover actual damages or $500, whichever is greater, and for injunctive relief against any person who has engaged in any act in violation of this chapter.

(b)

In the event the aggrieved party prevails, reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs may be awarded in addition to any damages awarded.

(c)

This section shall not be construed to impose liability on any employee or agent of an employer when that employee or agent has acted in accordance with the direction of his or her employer.

History

Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-69, § 5, 39 DCR 16
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3154.